Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2005
District court judgment; vacation; existence of valid claim or defense a prerequisite; preservation of liens upon modification.

A judgment shall not be vacated on motion or complaint, until it is adjudged that there is a valid defense to the action in which the judgment is rendered, or, if the plaintiff seeks its vacation, that there is a valid cause of action; and when a judgment is modified, all liens and securities obtained under it shall be preserved to the modified judgment.

R.S.1867, Code § 606, p. 501;

R.S.1913, § 8211;

C.S.1922, § 9164;

C.S.1929, § 20-2005;

R.S.1943, § 25-2005;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 29.

Prerequisite to vacation of judgment is showing of valid defense. Gasper v. Mazur, 157 Neb. 857, 62 N.W.2d 117 (1954).

Plaintiff seeking vacation of judgment after term must allege and prove valid cause of action. Morrill County v. Bliss, 125 Neb. 97, 249 N.W. 98 (1933).

Court must adjudge that cause of action is prima facie valid before it is authorized to take action on motion. Gavin v. Reed, 73 Neb. 237, 102 N.W. 455 (1905).

Mere showing of want of service of summons is not sufficient. Baldwin v. Burt, 54 Neb. 287, 74 N.W. 594 (1898).

Party seeking to vacate judgment after term must plead and prove valid cause or defense. Gilbert v. Marrow, 54 Neb. 77, 74 N.W. 420 (1898).

"Adjudged" means judicially determined. Western Assur. Co. of Toronto v. Klein, 48 Neb. 904, 67 N.W. 873 (1896).

Applicant must allege and prove valid defense or cause of action. Bond v. Wycoff, 42 Neb. 214, 60 N.W. 564 (1894).

Motion to vacate must be accompanied by answer. McBrien v. Riley, 38 Neb. 561, 57 N.W. 385 (1894).